Hawaii statutes.
[§257-8] Matches. (a) The State shall
match an amount of up to $100,000 per calendar year for individual development
accounts.

(b) Not more than a 2:1 match of state funds
to account holder deposits shall be deposited into any individual development account
in a given year. [L 1999, c 160, pt of §25]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next